Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4408.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5a. (1) A trustee with a presently exercisable discretionary power to make distributions of income or principal of an irrevocable trust to or for the benefit of 1 or more beneficiaries of the trust may, unless the terms of the first trust expressly provide otherwise, exercise the power by appointing all or part of the property subject to the power in favor of the trustee of a second trust, provided that if all of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) Except as provided in subsection (2), the beneficiaries of the second trust include only permissible appointees, even if fewer than all permissible appointees, of the trustee's discretionary distribution power as of the time the power is exercised. (b) For a trust, contributions to which have been excluded from gift tax under section 2503(c) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 2503(c), the trust instrument of the second trust provides that the beneficiary's remainder interest will pass or be payable no later than the date on which the interest would have passed or been payable under the terms of the first trust instrument. (c) The exercise of the discretionary power does not reduce the income, annuity, or unitrust interest or general power of appointment of a beneficiary of a trust that was intended to qualify for a marital or charitable deduction under federal or state law by virtue of that beneficiary's interest in the trust, whether or not that deduction is actually taken. (d) The exercise of the discretionary power does not reduce a presently exercisable general power to withdraw a specified percentage or amount of trust property in a trust beneficiary who is the only trust beneficiary to or for the benefit of whom the trustee has the power to make discretionary distributions. (2) The second trust instrument may provide 1 or more of the following: (a) A special or general power of appointment, including a power to appoint trust property to persons who are not beneficiaries of the first trust, to 1 or more of the beneficiaries of the second trust who are permissible appointees of the trustee's presently exercisable discretionary distribution power over the first trust. (b) That at a time or upon on the occurrence of an event specified in the second trust instrument, the trustee shall hold the remaining trust assets shall thereafter be held for the benefit of beneficiaries who are or who would have been beneficiaries of the first trust on terms and conditions substantially identical, with respect to the interests of those beneficiaries, to the terms and conditions of the first trust. (c) That assets of the first trust discovered after exercise of the power described in subsection (1) shall be property of the first trust if that trust continues in existence after exercise of the power, or that assets of the first trust discovered after exercise of the power shall be property of the second trust if the first trust terminates upon on exercise of the power. (d) For indemnification of the trustee of the first trust, except as limited by section 7908 of the MTC, MCL 700.7908. (3) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply: (a) A discretionary power to make distributions to a given trust beneficiary is presently exercisable when the timeliness of a present distribution to or for the benefit of that beneficiary depends, under the terms of the trust instrument, only on the trustee's judgment as to what is in the beneficiary's best interests. (b) A power to make distributions is not discretionary if it is limited by a definite and ascertainable standard, but instructions for the trustee to consider such things as a beneficiary's best interests, welfare, comfort, happiness, or general development do not in themselves constitute definite and ascertainable standards, regardless of whether the trustee is also instructed or permitted to consider resources outside the trust that may be available to the beneficiary. (c) A general power annually to withdraw a specified percentage or amount of trust property is presently exercisable with respect to any year for which the beneficiary who holds the power is entitled, under the terms of the governing instrument, to exercise the power, and each subsequent year for which the beneficiary will be entitled to exercise the power assuming only the beneficiary's survival and the continuation of the trust. For example, if a trust provides that, beginning in the fifth year after the trust becomes irrevocable, the beneficiary shall have the power for the remainder of his or her life annually to withdraw $5,000.00 or 5% of the value of the trust principal, whichever is greater, then, in the fourth year after the trust becomes irrevocable, the beneficiary's power to make annual withdrawals is not presently exercisable; however, in the fifth year after the trust becomes irrevocable, the beneficiary's power is presently exercisable, for purposes of this section, with respect to the fifth year and each subsequent year during the beneficiary's life. (4) The trustee of the second trust may be the trustee of the first trust, the second trust may be a trust under the governing instrument of the first trust or another governing instrument, the governing instrument may be one created by the trustee of the first trust, and the governing instrument may be the instrument that exercises the power described in subsection (1). (5) A second trust shall be treated as both of the following: (a) A new irrevocable trust for purposes of the notice requirements of section 7814(2)(c) of the MTC, MCL 700.7814. (b) A continuation of the first trust for purposes of the notice requirements of section 7814(2)(d) of the MTC, MCL 700.7814, and the charge of any fee or commission on the transfer of assets from the first trust to the second trust shall be treated as a change in the rate of the trustee's compensation. (6) A discretionary power under subsection (1) is a power of appointment and a discretionary power for purposes of section 7815 of the MTC, MCL 700.7815. (7) This section shall does not abridge the right of a trustee who has a power to distribute trust property in further trust under this act, any other statute, or the common law. This section shall does not abridge the right of a trustee who has a power to amend or revoke a trust. (8) It is the intent of the legislature that this section be a codification of the common law of this state in effect before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section.December 28, 2012. (9) As used in this section, "first trust" means an irrevocable trust over which a trustee has a presently exercisable discretionary power to make distributions that is exercised as described in subsection (1). Sec. 14. (1) The Any finite period during which the vesting of a future interest may be suspended or postponed by an instrument exercising the exercise of a power of appointment begins on the effective date of the instrument of exercise in the case of a general power presently exercisable, and in all other situations, at the time of the creation of the power. (2) In determining the any finite period during which the vesting of a future interest may be suspended or postponed by the exercise of a power of appointment, if a second power is created by the exercise of a first power, and the first power is a presently exercisable general power, the second power is considered to have been created on the effective date of the instrument of exercise. In all other situations, the second power is considered to have been created at the time of the creation of the first power. (3) The length of the period, whether finite or infinite, during which the vesting of a future interest may be suspended or postponed by the exercise of a power is determined , from the beginning date specified in subsection (1), under the personal property trust perpetuities act, 2008 PA 148, MCL 554.91 to 554.94, or section 5(2) of the uniform statutory rule against perpetuities, 1988 PA 418, MCL 554.75, to the extent that all of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) An instrument exercises a power of appointment so as to subject property to or to create a trust that is either revocable on or created after May 28, 2008. (b) The appointive property is personal property. (c) The trust is not a special appointee trust. (4) For purposes of subsection (3), a trust that is created by the exercise of a power of appointment is created when the power has been irrevocably exercised or when a revocable exercise becomes irrevocable. (5) (4) As used in this section: (a) "First power" means a power of appointment, an exercise of which has created another power of appointment. (b) "Second power" means a power of appointment created by the exercise of a first power. (c) "Special appointee trust" means that term as defined in section 4 of the personal property trust perpetuities act, 2008 PA 148, MCL 554.94.